District of Columbia statutes.
2-1431.05

Plans and reports to be made available to the public.

(a)

Agencies shall make all ADA plans and reports required under this unit available on their websites and shall provide copies to the public upon request.

(b)

The Office shall make all plans and reports required under this unit available on its website and shall provide copies to the public upon request.

Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-239, § 6, 54 DCR 404